Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202646-2,118
Instream appropriation; limited to defined stream segment.

(1) All water used to provide instream flows shall be applied only to that segment of the stream for which the appropriation is granted. The stream segment and the determination of a reasonable and necessary amount of water required for instream flow purposes shall be defined specifically by the Chief Water Officer in the permit.

(2) After the water allowed for instream flows has passed through the defined stream segment, all rights to such water shall be deemed relinquished and the water shall be available for appropriation.

Laws 1984, LB 1106, § 34;

Laws 2000, LB 900, § 151;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 135.

When an instream flow application requests different flow rates at different locations along a single stream segment, the denial of the application as to one location is to be viewed as a reduction in the requested rate of flow as authorized by section 46-2,115. Any reduction in the length of the stream segment occasioned by such denial is but incidental to the flow reduction, and the director may define the stream segment under subsection (1) of this section in such a way as to reflect the appropriations as granted. In re Application A-16642, 236 Neb. 671, 463 N.W.2d 591 (1990).